Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1026.
do enact as follows:SB1026,11Section 1. 115.28 (55s) of the statutes is created to read:SB1026,2,42115.28 (55s) African American history; model standards; curriculum. 3(a) Develop a model curriculum for grades kindergarten to 12 on African American 4history that does all of the following:SB1026,2,751. Includes developmentally appropriate instruction in the history of African 6Americans in the United States in general, and in this state in particular, and 7incorporates that history into the broader context of national and state history.SB1026,2,1082. Includes instruction in the experiences of African Americans in, and the 9contributions of African Americans to, the origins and development of the United 10States and this state.SB1026,3,213. Includes instruction in the anthropological migration of people into this 2state.SB1026,3,434. Includes tools to help pupils analyze history as a means to understand 4current events and envision a positive multicultural society.SB1026,3,755. Specifies the essential knowledge and associated performance standards 6regarding African American history that are incorporated into the social studies 7curriculum in each grade.SB1026,3,108(b) Incorporate African American history instruction that is consistent with 9the curriculum developed under par. (a) into the model academic standards for 10social studies.SB1026,3,1411(c) Employ 3 full-time education consultants to assist school boards, operators 12of charter schools authorized under s. 118.40 (2r) and (2x), and governing bodies of 13private schools with updating curriculum and providing African American history 14instruction.SB1026,215Section 2. 118.165 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB1026,3,1816118.165 (3) The governing body of a private school shall ensure that the 17private school, as part of the private school’s curriculum, includes the instruction in 18African American history required under s. 121.02 (1) (L) 4m.SB1026,319Section 3. 118.19 (8) of the statutes is renumbered 118.19 (8) (intro.) and 20amended to read:SB1026,3,2321118.19 (8) (intro.) The state superintendent may not grant to any person a 22license to teach unless the person has received instruction in the study of minority 23group relations, including instruction in all of the following:SB1026,4,21(a) The history, culture, and tribal sovereignty of the federally recognized 2American Indian tribes and bands located in this state.SB1026,43Section 4. 118.19 (8) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB1026,4,54118.19 (8) (b) The history of African American people consistent with the 5model curriculum developed under s. 115.28 (55s) (a).SB1026,56Section 5. 118.40 (2r) (b) 2. m. of the statutes is created to read:SB1026,4,97118.40 (2r) (b) 2. m. A requirement that the charter school’s curriculum 8include the instruction in African American history required under s. 121.02 (1) (L) 94m.SB1026,610Section 6. 118.40 (2x) (b) 2. m. of the statutes is created to read:SB1026,4,1311118.40 (2x) (b) 2. m. A requirement that the charter school’s curriculum 12include the instruction in African American history required under s. 121.02 (1) (L) 134m.SB1026,714Section 7. 121.02 (1) (L) 4m. of the statutes is created to read:SB1026,4,1715121.02 (1) (L) 4m. As part of the social studies curriculum, include instruction 16in African American history that is consistent with the model curriculum developed 17under s. 115.28 (55s) (a) in each elementary and high school grade.SB1026,818Section 8. Nonstatutory provisions.SB1026,4,2119(1) Development of model curriculum. In developing the model 20curriculum required under s. 115.28 (55s) (a), the state superintendent of public 21instruction shall collaborate with all of the following:SB1026,4,2222(a) The African-American/Jewish Friendship Group, Inc., or its successor.SB1026,4,2323(b) Wisconsin Black Historical Society and Museum, Inc., or its successor.SB1026,4,2424(c) America’s Black Holocaust Museum., or its successor.SB1026,5,11(d) The University of Wisconsin System.SB1026,92Section 9. Fiscal changes.SB1026,5,103(1) Education consultant positions. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for 4the appropriation to the department of public instruction under s. 20.255 (1) (a), the 5dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $384,900 to increase the 6authorized FTE positions for the department by 3.0 GPR positions for the education 7consultants required under s. 115.28 (55s) (c). In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) 8for the appropriation to the department of public instruction under s. 20.255 (1) (a), 9the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $384,900 to provide 10funding for the positions authorized under this subsection.SB1026,1011Section 10. Initial applicability.SB1026,5,1412(1) Curriculum requirements. The treatment of ss. 118.165 (3), 118.40 (2r) 13(b) 2. m. and (2x) (b) 2. m., and 121.02 (1) (L) 4m. first applies to curriculum for the 14school year that begins after the effective date of this subsection.SB1026,1115Section 11. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 16publication, except as follows:SB1026,5,1917(1) Licensure requirements. The renumbering and amendment of s. 118.19 18(8) and the creation of s. 118.19 (8) (b) take effect on the first day of the 13th month 19beginning after publication.SB1026,5,2020